Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-520.02
Open burning ban; range-management burning; violations; penalty.

Any person violating the statewide open burning ban established by section 81-520.01 or violating sections 81-520.03 to 81-520.05 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 810, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 19, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 408, § 2.